Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3207
Order; compliance.

The judge of the court in this state may enter an order directing compliance with the terms and conditions prescribed by the judge of the state in which the witness is confined.

Laws 1969, c. 229, § 7, p. 856.